South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1009.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  The Department of Environmental Services shall conduct an investigation to determine the origin of the use of polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs) around Lake Wateree and the Catawba-Wateree River basin leading to its contamination and resulting in an accumulation of PCBs in the ecological and aquatic life in the lake and the basin. The investigation shall seek to identify the party or parties that are responsible for the contamination, including whether Duke Energy, or its predecessors in interest, bear any of the responsibility for the contamination. The department may engage the Office of Inspector General and his investigatory staff to assist with the investigation. The department shall report its findings to the Governor, the General Assembly, the Office of Regulatory Staff, and the Public Service Commission on or before December 31, 2026. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----